Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3103
Board, defined.

Board means the Board of Psychology.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 64;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 136;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.02;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1037.